Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.781

Action on plan of merger by constituent limited partnership.

(1) Subject to RCW 25.10.796, a plan of merger must be consented to by all the partners of a constituent limited partnership.

(2) Subject to RCW 25.10.796 and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under RCW 25.10.786, a constituent limited partnership may amend the plan or abandon the planned merger:

(a) As provided in the plan; and

(b) Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

(3) If a domestic corporation is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be adopted and approved as provided in *chapter 23B.11 RCW.

(4) If a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be approved as provided in RCW 25.05.375.

(5) If a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, the plan of merger shall be approved as provided in RCW 25.15.421.

[ 2015 c 188 s 118; 2009 c 188 s 1107.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.

Effective date—2015 c 188: See RCW 25.15.903.